src/fst/morphology/affixes/verbs.lexc
!! Verb inflection
!  ---------------
!! The No linguistic content language verbs inflect in persons.

LEXICON Persons
+V+Sg1:en   #   ;
+V+Sg2:et   #   ;
+V+Sg3:e    #   ;
+V+Pl1:ien  #   ;
+V+Pl2:iet  #   ;
+V+Pl3:iet  #   ;
+V+Inf:0    #   ;
#:0   Nouns   ;

! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:
